Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1808
Accident; report; suspend permit; inspection.

The owner of an amusement ride shall send a copy of any accident report required by his or her insurer to the commissioner. The commissioner may provide for the suspension of the permit of operation for any amusement ride the breakdown or malfunction of which directly caused serious injury or death of any person. The commissioner may also require an inspection of any amusement ride, whose operation has resulted in any serious injury or death, before operation of such amusement ride may be resumed.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 8.